Idaho, session 2026, S1385.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Industrial Commission the following
amounts to be expended according to the designated programs and expense
classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30,
2027:
FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
I. COMPENSATION:
FROM:
Industrial Administration
Fund $252,000 $24,200 $276,200
PeaceOfficerandDetentionOfficerTemporaryDisability
Fund $68,900 68,900
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 20,000 0 0 20,000
TOTAL $272,000 $24,200 $68,900 $365,100
II. REHABILITATION:
FROM:
Industrial Administration
Fund $39,500 $39,500
III. CRIME VICTIMS COMPENSATION:
FROM:
Crime Victims Compensation
Fund $36,000 $36,000
GRAND TOTAL $308,000 $63,700 $68,900 $440,600


SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.